Utah statutes.
39-1-59.   Compensation for injury or death.

If any officer or enlisted person of the National Guard is wounded, injured, or otherwise acquires a disability, or is killed or dies of wounds or injuries received while serving on state active duty, under orders of competent authority and not as a result of the person's own misconduct, the person, the surviving spouse, children, or any dependent relatives, shall receive from the state relief as the Legislature determines.  However, in these cases the member, surviving spouse, children, or any dependent relatives, upon investigation by a board of inquiry appointed by the commander in chief, the findings and recommendations of which shall be filed with the state auditor for the action of the Board of Examiners, shall receive temporary compensation from the state, out of funds appropriated for the maintenance of the National Guard, as determined by the Board of Examiners until the next regular session of the Legislature.  This compensation may not exceed the rates of pay provided for officers and enlisted persons in this chapter.

